Utah statutes.
63G-6-421.   Records of contracts made.
The chief procurement officer or the head of a purchasing agency shall
maintain a record listing all contracts made under Section 63G-6-410 or
63G-6-411 and shall maintain the record in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
2, Government Records Access and Management Act.  The record shall contain
each contractor's name, the amount and type of each contract, and a listing of
the supplies, services, or construction procured under each contract.
